test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_A_NoExtra_pikwan_gt-norm.yaml
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: pikwanenhimibanan
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: pikwanenhimibanag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: pikwanenhimibaning
     pikwan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: pikwanenhim***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: pikwanenhim***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: pikwanenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: pikwanensishinaaniban
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: pikwanensishinaan***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: pikwanensishiwaaiban
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: pikwanensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: pikwanensishiniiban
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: pikwanensishini***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: pikwanenhishinaaniban
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: pikwanenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: pikwanenhishiwaaiban
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: pikwanenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: pikwanenhishiniiban
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: pikwanenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: pikwanensishinaanan
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: pikwanensishinaanag
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: pikwanensishinaaning
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: pikwanensishiwaaan
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: pikwanensishiwaaag
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: pikwanensishiwaaing
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: pikwanensishinian
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: pikwanensishiniag
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: pikwanensishiniing
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: pikwanenhishinaanan
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: pikwanenhishinaanag
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: pikwanenhishinaaning
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: pikwanenhishiwaaan
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: pikwanenhishiwaaag
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: pikwanenhishiwaaing
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: pikwanenhishinian
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: pikwanenhishiniag
     pikwan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: pikwanenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: pikwanensishibanan
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: pikwanensishibanag
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: pikwanensishibaning
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: pikwanensish***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: pikwanensish***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: pikwanensish***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: pikwanenhishibanan
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: pikwanenhishibanag
     pikwan+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: pikwanenhishibaning
     pikwan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: pikwanenhish***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: pikwanenhish***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: pikwanenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: pikwanensinaanibanan
     pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: pikwanensinaanibanag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: pikwanensinaanibaning
     pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanensinaan***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: pikwanensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: pikwanensiwaaibanan
     pikwan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: pikwanensiwaaibanag
     pikwan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: pikwanensiwaaibaning
     pikwan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: pikwanensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: pikwanensiniibanan
     pikwan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: pikwanensiniibanag
     pikwan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: pikwanensiniibaning
     pikwan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: pikwanensini***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: pikwanensini***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: pikwanensini***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: pikwanenhinaanibanan
     pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: pikwanenhinaanibanag
     pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: pikwanenhinaanibaning
     pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: pikwanenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: pikwanenhiwaaibanan
     pikwan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: pikwanenhiwaaibanag
     pikwan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: pikwanenhiwaaibaning
     pikwan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: pikwanenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: pikwanenhiniibanan
     pikwan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: pikwanenhiniibanag
     pikwan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: pikwanenhiniibaning
     pikwan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: pikwanenhini***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: pikwanenhini***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: pikwanenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: pikwanimishinaaniban
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: pikwanimishinaan***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: pikwanimishiwaaiban
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: pikwanimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: pikwanimishiniiban
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: pikwanimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: pikwanimishinaanan
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: pikwanimishinaanag
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: pikwanimishinaaning
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: pikwanimishiwaaan
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: pikwanimishiwaaag
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: pikwanimishiwaaing
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: pikwanimishinian
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: pikwanimishiniag
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: pikwanimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: pikwanimishibanan
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: pikwanimishibanag
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: pikwanimishibaning
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: pikwanimish***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: pikwanimish***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: pikwanimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: pikwaniminaanibanan
     pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: pikwaniminaanibanag
     pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: pikwaniminaanibaning
     pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: pikwaniminaan***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: pikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: pikwaniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: pikwanimiwaaibanan
     pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: pikwanimiwaaibanag
     pikwan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: pikwanimiwaaibaning
     pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: pikwanimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: pikwaniminiibanan
     pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: pikwaniminiibanag
     pikwan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: pikwaniminiibaning
     pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: pikwanimini***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: pikwanimini***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: pikwanimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: pikwanishinaanibanan
     pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: pikwanishinaanibanag
     pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: pikwanishinaanibaning
     pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanishinaan***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: pikwanishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: pikwanishiwaaibanan
     pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: pikwanishiwaaibanag
     pikwan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: pikwanishiwaaibaning
     pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: pikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: pikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: pikwanishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: pikwanishiniibanan
     pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: pikwanishiniibanag
     pikwan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: pikwanishiniibaning
     pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: pikwanishini***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: pikwanishini***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: pikwanishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nipikwanensimishinaan
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nipikwanensimishiwaa
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nipikwanensimishini
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nipikwanenhimishinaan
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nipikwanenhimishiwaa
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nipikwanenhimishini
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gipikwanensimishinaan
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gipikwanensimishiwaa
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gipikwanensimishini
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gipikwanenhimishinaan
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gipikwanenhimishiwaa
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gipikwanenhimishini
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: opikwanensimishinaan
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: opikwanensimishiwaa
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: opikwanensimishini
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: opikwanenhimishinaan
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: opikwanenhimishiwaa
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: opikwanenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nipikwanensimishiban
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nipikwanensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nipikwanenhimishiban
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nipikwanenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gipikwanensimishiban
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gipikwanensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gipikwanenhimishiban
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gipikwanenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: opikwanensimishiban
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: opikwanensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: opikwanenhimishiban
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: opikwanenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: nipikwanensimishan
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nipikwanensimishag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nipikwanensimishing
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nipikwanenhimishan
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nipikwanenhimishag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nipikwanenhimishing
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: gipikwanensimishan
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gipikwanensimishag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gipikwanensimishing
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: gipikwanenhimishan
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gipikwanenhimishag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gipikwanenhimishing
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: opikwanensimishan
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: opikwanensimishag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: opikwanensimishing
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: opikwanenhimishan
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: opikwanenhimishag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: opikwanenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nipikwanensiminaaniban
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nipikwanensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nipikwanensimiwaaiban
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: nipikwanensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: nipikwanensiminiiban
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: nipikwanensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nipikwanenhiminaaniban
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nipikwanenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nipikwanenhimiwaaiban
